Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 General Provisions

31-5-1.
Adoption of rules and regulations.

All rules and regulations of the Department of Public Health and any county board of health shall be adopted after due notice to and hearing by persons and parties affected thereby; and such rules and regulations shall be maintained in a book kept for that purpose, orderly arranged and indexed and subject to inspection by the public during regular business hours. The agency adopting such rules and regulations shall make copies thereof available for distribution to persons interested in or affected thereby. Such agencies are also authorized to provide for the mimeographing, printing, or other reproduction of their regulations and the distribution thereof. No rule or regulation shall become effective as law until 30 days after its adoption, except in cases of emergencies constituting an imminent threat to the public, in which event such rules or regulations shall become effective upon adoption; but, in all such cases, the agency adopting same shall as a part thereof state the conditions found by it to justify such immediate effectiveness. Where deemed desirable by the agency, hearing and notice as provided in Code Section 31-5-2 may be conducted by it prior to adoption of any rule or regulation.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-307, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-5-2.
Hearings.

Hearings shall be required for any and all quasi-judicial actions and in any other proceeding required by this title or the Constitution of Georgia. All such hearings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1933, § 88-304, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 309, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1290, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 31; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-22/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment was applicable to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

31-5-3.
Appeals.

Any person who is a party to a proceeding and who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any final order or action of a county board of health or agency of the department may have review thereof by appeal to the department. Any person who is a party to a proceeding and who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any final order or action of the department may have review thereof by appeal to the superior court in the county in which the action arose or to the Superior Court of Fulton County.

Appeals to the department shall be heard by it after not less than 20 days’ notice delivered by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery is given to all parties and their counsel of record, at such times and places as are set forth in such notice; provided, however, if such appeal is not heard and determined within a period of 90 days, the decision shall stand reversed unless all parties consent to an extension of time. Review on appeal to the department shall be confined to the record transmitted from below and the questions raised in the appeal. Orders, rules, regulations, or other decisions of county boards of health or other agencies of the department shall not be set aside on appeal to the department unless contrary to law or rules and regulations of the department, or unsupported by substantial evidence on the record as a whole, or unreasonable.

Appeal to the superior court shall be by petition which shall be filed in the clerk’s office of such court within 30 days after the final order or action of the department; the petition shall set forth the names of the parties taking the appeal, the order, rule, regulation, or decision appealed from, and the reason it is claimed to be erroneous. The enforcement of the order or action appealed from shall not be stayed until and unless so ordered and directed by the reviewing court. A reviewing court may order a stay only if the court makes a finding that the public health, safety, and welfare will not be harmed by the issuance of the stay. Upon the filing of such petition, the petitioner shall serve on the commissioner a copy thereof in a manner prescribed by law for the service of process, unless such service of process is waived. The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the record. In cases of alleged irregularities in procedure before the department, not shown in the record, proof thereon may be taken in the court. The court, upon request, shall hear oral argument and receive written briefs. The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the department as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court may affirm the decision of the department or remand the case for further proceedings. The court may reverse or modify the decision if substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced because the administrative findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the department;

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Affected by other error of law;

Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or

Arbitrary or capricious or characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

Upon perfection of the appeal as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, it shall be the duty of the agency whose order, rule, regulation, or decision is under review by the department to cause a transcript of all pleadings, orders, evidence, and other proceedings including a copy of the appeal and motion for reconsideration, if any, filed with it to be transmitted to the department or the superior court in not more than 30 days. For the proceedings not reported, the agency or the department shall cause to be written out a narrative transcript of all evidence and proceedings before it under certificate of its director or examiner or other official conducting such hearings.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-305, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1280, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, in paragraph (a)(3) the paragraphs (1) through (6) added were redesignated as subparagraphs (a)(3)(A) through (a)(3)(F), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment was applicable to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).

31-5-4.
Testimony or production of evidence by compulsory process.

The testimony of any witnesses or the production of any books, papers, records, documents, physical objects, or other evidence for inspection may be compelled by any superior court of competent jurisdiction on application of the department or any county board of health seeking such process.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-303, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-5-5.
Classification of confidential and privileged materials.

The department and county boards of health are authorized by regulation to classify as confidential and privileged documents, reports and other information and data obtained by them from persons, firms, corporations, municipalities, counties, and other public authorities and political subdivisions, where such matters relate to secret processes, formulas, and methods or where such matters were obtained or furnished on a confidential basis. All matters so classified shall not be subject to public inspection or discovery and shall not be subject to production or disclosure in any court of law or elsewhere until and unless the judge of the court of competent jurisdiction, after in camera inspection, determines that the public interest requires such production and disclosure or that such production and disclosure may be necessary in the interests of justice.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-306, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 42/HB 24.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

31-5-6.
Distribution of rules.

The department and all county boards of health are directed to prescribe and make available for distribution the rules of practice and procedure to implement this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-308, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-5-7.
Application of this chapter.

This chapter shall apply to all other chapters of this title and all amendments hereafter enacted with respect thereto unless provided otherwise expressly or by necessary implication.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-309, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-5-8.
Penalty for violations of the provisions of this title.

Any person violating the provisions of this title shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, provided that this Code section shall not apply to violations of the provisions of Chapter 20, 22, or 24 of this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-301, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Mandatory Quarantine:
Administrative Order by the Georgia Department of Public Health for Public Health Control Measures:
Isolation Protocol,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2020).

31-5-9.
Injunctions for enjoining violations of the provisions of this title; supersedeas; attachment for contempt; injunctions to abate public nuisances; where actions may be instituted.

The Department of Public Health and all county boards of health and the Department of Community Health, as appropriate, are empowered to institute appropriate proceedings for injunction in the courts of competent jurisdiction in this state for the purpose of enjoining a violation of any provision of this title as now existing or as may be hereafter amended or of any regulation or order duly issued by the department, any county board of health, or the Department of Community Health provided that this Code section shall not apply to violations of the provisions of Chapter 20 of this title. The department, the county boards of health, and the Department of Community Health, as appropriate, are also empowered to maintain action for injunction to abate any public nuisance which is injurious to the public health, safety, or comfort. Such actions may be maintained notwithstanding the fact that such violation also constitutes a crime and notwithstanding that other adequate remedies at law exist. Such actions may be instituted in the name of the department, any county board, or the Department of Community Health, as the case may be, in the county in which a violation of any provision of this title occurs. For purposes of this Code section, the county boards of health are declared to be legal entities capable of maintaining actions in their respective names without naming the individuals constituting such board, or acting on behalf of the department, as the case may be.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 5-6-13, an appeal or a notice of intent to appeal an adjudication of contempt of court of a party subject to an interlocutory or final judgment in a court action for an injunction instituted under authority of this Code section for a violation of a licensing requirement of this title shall not operate as a supersedeas unless it is so ordered by the court; provided, however, that the court may grant a supersedeas in such a case after making a finding that the health, safety, or welfare of the recipients of the services will not be substantially harmed by the issuance of the stay.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, an interlocutory or final judgment in an action granting an injunction under this Code section may be enforced by attachment for contempt.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-302, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 544, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-10/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-5-10.
Notifying department or board of health of conditions on private property which are injurious to the public; inspection warrant; notice to owner and occupant; abatement.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply only in those counties of this state having a population of 450,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census.

Any person who knows or suspects that a condition exists on private property, which condition is injurious to the public health, safety, or comfort, shall immediately notify the Department of Public Health or the county board of health. Upon receiving such notice, the department or the county board of health shall be authorized to obtain an inspection warrant as provided in Code Section 31-5-21. If the department or the county board of health determines that there exists a condition which is injurious to the public health, safety, or comfort, the department or county board of health shall, by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery with return receipt requested, notify the occupants of the property and, if different from the occupant, the person, firm, or corporation which owns the property. Notice to the owner shall be sent to the address shown on the county or municipal property tax records.

If the department or the county board of health brings an action for injunction to abate a public nuisance which is injurious to the public health, safety, or comfort, process shall be served on the occupants of the property and on any person, firm, or corporation having any interest in the property according to the county property records. Service shall be made in accordance with Code Section 9-11-4; and, if any person, firm, or corporation to be served resides outside the state, has departed the state, cannot, after due diligence, be found within the state, or conceals himself to avoid the service of summons, the judge or clerk may make an order that the service be made by publication of summons as provided in Code Section 9-11-4.

In addition to any form of relief ordered by the court, the superior court may, as a part of its order, authorize the department or the county board of health to take appropriate action to abate such public nuisance. Any cost incurred by the department or the county board of health to abate such nuisance shall constitute a lien against the property, and such lien shall have the same status and priority as a lien for taxes.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-5-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 388, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 598, § 1-10/HB 72.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment was applicable to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (2015).